Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2620SV (1) 91 dg/jh S.F. 521 Section 1. Section 598.23, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . e. Direct the person found in contempt 3 to pay the reasonable attorney fees incurred by a party as a 4 result of the personâs actions constituting contempt. 5